New Jersey, session 222, S2177.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The prosecutor of each county shall collect, record, and report data to the Attorney General concerning a crime or, in the case of a juvenile, an act which if committed by an adult would constitute a crime involving the use of a firearm, as defined in subsection f. of N.J.S.2C:39-1, that did not result in bodily injury. b.    The prosecutor of each county shall provide information to the Attorney General regarding criminal complaints pursuant to subsection a. of this section, which shall include: (1) the complaint number; (2) the date and time of the incident; (3) the location of the incident, including the county, municipality, and address; (4) the statutory citation and degree of all offenses charged; and (5) whether the defendant lawfully or unlawfully used the firearm subject to the charge. The prosecutor of each county shall provide the information required in this subsection for criminal complaints, regardless of whether the case is prosecuted, dismissed, or downgraded. 2.    Beginning on January 1 next following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the prosecutor of each county shall provide the information required pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) to the Attorney General on a quarterly basis for a period of three years, in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General.  At the end of the three years, the Attorney General shall submit a report that compiles the information collected to the Governor, and the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), and shall publish the report on the Internet website of the Department of Law and Public Safety. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.